Washington statutes.
RCW 28B.109.070

Washington international exchange scholarship endowment fund—State matching funds.

The office may request that the treasurer deposit state matching funds into the Washington international exchange scholarship endowment fund when the office can match the state funds with an equal amount of private cash donations, including conditional gifts.

[ 2011 1st sp.s. c 11 s 201; 1996 c 253 s 407.]

NOTES:

Effective date—2011 1st sp.s. c 11 ss 101-103, 106-202, 204-244, and 301: See note following RCW 28B.76.020.

Intent—2011 1st sp.s. c 11: See note following RCW 28B.76.020.

Findings—Purpose—Severability—Part headings not law—1996 c 253: See notes following RCW 28B.109.010.